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*: ETCS trouble code No. is 13.

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The Electronic Throttle Control System (ETCS) has a dedicated power supply circuit. The voltage (+BM) is
monitored and when the voltage is low (less than 4V), the engine control ECU concludes that the ETCS has
a fault and current to the throttle control motor is cut.
When the voltage becomes unstable, the ETCS itself becomes unstable. For this reason, when the voltage
is low, the current to the motor is cut. If repairs are made and the system has returned to normal, turn the
ignition switch to OFF. The engine control ECU then allows current to flow to the motor and the motor can
be restarted.
HINT:
This Electrical Throttle Control System (ETCS) does not use a throttle cable.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P2118/89
Open in ETCS power source (+BM) circuit
(1 trip detection logic)

SOpen inETCSpowersourcecircuit
SETCSfuse
SEnginecontrolECU

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU monitors the battery supply voltage applied to the electronic throttle motor. When
the power supply voltage drops below the threshold, the engine control ECU concludes that the power sup-
ply has an open circuit. A DTC is set and the MIL is turned on.
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FAIL SAFE
If the ETCS (Electronic Throttle Control System) has a malfunction, the engine control ECU cuts off current
to the throttle control motor. The throttle control valve returns to a predetermined opening angle (approxi-
mately16 ˚ )by the forceof the returnspring.TheenginecontrolECUthenadjusts theengineoutputbycon-
trolling the fuel infection (intermittent fuel −cut)and ignition timing inaccordancewith theacceleratorpedal
opening angle to enable the vehicle to continue at a minimum speed.
If the accelerator pedal is depressed firmly and slowly, the vehicle can be driven slowly.
If a ”pass”condition isdetectedand then the ignitionswitch is turnedOFF, the fail −safeoperationwill stop
and the system will return to normal condition.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using the hand−held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air−fuel ratio was lean or rich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Check ETCS fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove the ETCS fuse from the engine room J/B.
CHECK:
Check the continuity of the ETCS fuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short in all harness and components
connected to ETCS fuse.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal +BM and E1 of engine control ECU connector.

CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E9
and E10 engine control ECU connector.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

+BM(E10 −6) − E7(E9 −1) 9 to 14 V

OK Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−3) .

NG
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3 Check for open or short in harness or connector between battery and ETCS fuse,
ETCS fuse and engine control ECU.

Check the harness and the connector between the ETCS
fuse and the engine control ECU:
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the ETCS fuse from the engine room J/B.
(b) Disconnect the E10 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal2) − +BM(E10 −6)

Below1 �

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal2)or+BM(E10 −6) −

Body ground
10k � orhigher

Check the harness and connector between the ETCS fuse
and the battery:
PREPARATION:
(a)Remove theETCSfuse fromtheengine roomJ/B.
(b) Disconnect the battery positive terminal.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal1) − Batterypositive terminal

Below1 �

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal 1) or

Batterypositive terminal − Bodyground
10k � orhigher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check engine room J/B.


